Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-2220
Notice of hearing; method and time of giving.

(a) If notice of a hearing on any petition is required and except for specific notice requirements as otherwise provided, the petitioner shall cause notice of the time and place of hearing of any petition to be given to any interested person or his or her attorney if he or she has appeared by attorney or requested that notice be sent to his or her attorney. Notice shall be given:

(1) If the identity and address of any person is known (i) by mailing a copy thereof at least fourteen days before the time set for the hearing by certified, registered, or ordinary first-class mail addressed to the person being notified at the post office address given in his or her demand for notice, if any, or at his or her office or place of residence, if known, or (ii) by delivering a copy thereof to the person being notified personally at least fourteen days before the time set for the hearing; and

(2) By publishing at least once a week for three consecutive weeks a copy thereof in a legal newspaper having general circulation in the county where the hearing is to be held, the last publication of which is to be at least three days before the time set for the hearing.

If the action pending on which notice is required is a guardianship or conservatorship action under sections 30-2601 to 30-2661, publication shall be required only if the identity or address of any person required to be served is not known.

(b) The court for good cause shown may provide for a different method or time of giving notice for any hearing.

(c) Proof of the giving of notice shall be made on or before the hearing and filed in the proceeding.

Laws 1974, LB 354, § 20, UPC § 1-401;

Laws 1978, LB 650, § 2;

Laws 1993, LB 782, § 3;

Laws 1997, LB 466, § 3.

This section clearly states that in a statutory proceeding, the notice required to be given to all interested parties is 14 days. In re Conservatorship of Holle, 254 Neb. 380, 576 N.W.2d 473 (1998).